California statutes. Water Code
Upon good cause shown, an amended statement of water production may be filed or a correction of the records may be made at any time within six months of filing the water production statement. If pursuant to Section 31144.79, the owner or operator has been notified of a determination by the district that the production of water from the water-producing facility is in excess of that disclosed by the sworn statement covering the water-producing facility, and that owner or operator fails to protest the determination in the manner and in the time set forth in Section 31144.79, the owner or operator shall be precluded from later filing an amended water production statement for that period for the water-producing facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31144.79.

(a) If the district has probable cause to believe that the production of water from any water-producing facility is in excess of that disclosed by the sworn statements covering the water-producing facility, or if no statements are filed covering any water-producing facility, the district may cause an investigation and report to be made concerning the production of water from each such water-producing facility. The district may fix the amount of water production from any such water-producing facility at an amount not to exceed the maximum production capacity of the water-producing facility.

(b) After the determination has been made by the district, a written notice thereof shall be mailed to the person operating the water-producing facility at the address shown by the district’s records. The determination made by the district shall be conclusive on all persons having an interest in the water-producing facility, and the groundwater charge, interest, and penalties thereon, shall be paid forthwith, unless that person files with the board within 15 days after the mailing of the notice, a written protest setting forth the ground or grounds for protesting the amount of production so fixed. Upon the filing of that protest, the board shall hold a hearing at which time the total amount of the water production and the groundwater charge thereon shall be determined, which shall be conclusive if based upon substantial evidence. If the water production statement was filed and the amount disclosed thereon was paid within the time required under this article, and the board finds that the failure to report the amount of water actually produced resulted from excusable or justifiable circumstances, the board may waive the charge of interest on the amount found to be due. A notice of the hearing shall be mailed to the protestant at least 10 days before the date fixed for the hearing. Notice of the determination by the board shall be mailed to each protestant, who shall have 30 days from the date of mailing to pay the groundwater charge, interest, or penalties provided under this article.

(c) Notice as required in this section shall be given by deposit thereof in any postal facility regularly maintained by the government of the United States in a sealed envelope with postage paid, addressed to the person on whom it is served at the name and address disclosed by the records of the district. This service is complete at the time of deposit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Stinson Beach County Water District [31145. - 31149.]

31145.

In addition to the other powers provided by law, the Stinson Beach County Water District, Marin County, shall have all of the following powers and shall promptly and effectively exercise such powers as may be appropriate for improving water quality and supply, reducing use of water, and preventing nuisance, pollution, waste, and contamination of water:

(a) To carry on technical and other investigations, examinations, or tests, of all kinds, make measurements, collect data, and make analyses, studies, and inspections pertaining to the water supply, use of water, water quality, nuisance, pollution, waste, and contamination of water, both within and without the district, including, but not limited to, such activities related to use of public, combined, or private septic and septic tank disposal systems.

(b) To regulate, prohibit, or control the discharge of pollutants, waste, or any other materials into the ground or surface waters of the district or the contiguous seashores of the district by requiring dischargers to obtain a permit from the district prior to any such discharge and by prohibiting the discharge of pollutants, sewage, septic drainage, or any other material which does or may cause a nuisance into the ground or surface waters of the district or the contiguous seashores of the district without a permit having first been obtained from the district; to charge fees for the issuance and periodic renewal of such permits in such amount as will defray all or a portion of the costs of exercising the powers provided in this article; to require all permittees to indemnify the district from any and all damages, penalties, or other expenses imposed on or required of the district by federal, state, regional, or local agencies due to any discharge by such permittees into ground or surface waters of the district or the contiguous seashores of the district; to require as a condition of obtaining discharge permits from the district that all such dischargers also obtain state and federal waste discharge permits and any other permits required by federal, state, regional, or local law.

(c) To adopt and enforce regulations within the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the district, after holding a public hearing on reasonable notice thereof, to control and enhance the quality of the ground and surface waters of the district, to eliminate the pollution, waste, and contamination of water flowing into, through, or originating within water courses and impoundments, both natural and artificial, within the district, to prevent contamination, nuisance, pollution, or otherwise rendering unfit for beneficial use the surface or ground water used or useful in the district, and to expend such amounts as are necessary to exercise such powers from the funds of the district.

(d) To increase, to improve the quality of, and to prevent the waste or diminution of the water supply in, or unlawful exportation of water from, the district; to obtain, retain, conserve, treat by physical, chemical, or biological processes, or otherwise reclaim sanitary, sewage, drainage, storm, flood, and other water for beneficial use within the district or for storage, discharge, or disposal in accordance with legally established water quality specifications; and, whenever the board of directors shall find it to be in the best interests of the district so to do, to sell such water for agricultural, domestic, or other beneficial purposes within or without the district upon such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 925.)
-------------------------------------------

31146.

The district shall immediately do all such acts as are reasonably necessary to secure compliance with any federal, state, regional or local law, order, regulation or rule relating to water pollution or the discharge of pollutants, waste or any other material within the area of the district. For such purpose, any authorized representative of the district, upon presentation of his credentials, or, if necessary under the circumstances, after obtaining an inspection warrant pursuant to Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, shall have the right of entry to any premises on which a water pollution, waste, or contamination source, including, but not limited to, septic tanks, is located for the purpose of inspecting such source, including securing samples of discharges therefrom, or any records required to be maintained in connection therewith by federal, state, or local law, order, regulation, or rule.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 925.)
-------------------------------------------

31147.

(a) Violation of any of the provisions of a district regulation adopted pursuant to Section 31145 may be abated as a public nuisance by the district, and the board may by regulation establish a procedure for the abatement of such a nuisance and to assess the cost of such abatement to the violator. If the violator maintains the nuisance upon real property in which he has a fee title interest, the assessment shall constitute a lien upon such real property.

(b) The amount of any costs incurred by the district in abating such a nuisance upon real property, shall be added to, and become part of, the annual taxes next levied upon the real property subject to abatement and shall constitute a lien upon that real property as of the same time and in the same manner as does the tax lien securing such annual taxes. All laws applicable to the levy, collection, and enforcement of district taxes shall be applicable to such assessment, except that if any real property to which such lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value, or if a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value has been created and attached thereon, prior to the date on which the first installment of such taxes would become delinquent, then a lien which would otherwise be imposed by this section shall not attach to such real property and the delinquent and unpaid charges relating to such property shall be transferred to the unsecured roll for collection. Any amounts of such assessments collected are to be credited to the funds of the district from which the costs of abatement were expended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 925.)
-------------------------------------------

31148.

(a) The owner of any real property upon which is located a sanitary sewage, septic, or septic tank disposal system, which system is subject to abatement as a public nuisance by the district, may request the district to replace or repair, as necessary, such system. If replacement or repair is feasible, the board of directors, in its sole discretion, may provide for the necessary replacement or repair work.

(b) The person or persons employed by the board of directors to do the work shall have a lien, subject to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 31147, for work done and materials furnished, and the work done and materials furnished shall be deemed to have been done and furnished at the request of the owner. The district, in the discretion of the board of directors, may pay all, or any part, of the cost or price of the work done and materials furnished; and, to the extent that the district pays the cost or price of the work done and materials furnished, the district shall succeed to and have all the rights, including, but not limited to, the lien, of such person or persons employed to do the work against the real property and the owner.

(c) As an alternative power to the enforcement of the lien provided in subdivision (b), the board of directors may, by ordinance adopted by two-thirds vote of the members, fix the costs of replacement or repair; fix the times at which such costs shall become due; provide prior to the replacement or repair for the payment of the costs in installments over a period, not to exceed 15 years; establish a rate of interest, not to exceed 8 percent per annum, to be charged on the unpaid balance of the costs; and provide that the amount of the costs and the interest shall constitute a lien, subject to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 31147, against the respective lots or parcels upon which the work is done.

(d) With the written consent of the owner and the lienholder, if other than the district, the board of directors may issue an improvement bond pursuant to the improvement bond provisions of the Improvement Act of 1911 (Part 5 (commencing with Section 6400) of Division 7 of the Streets and Highways Code), to represent and be secured by the lien established pursuant to subdivision (b). The bond may be delivered to the lienholder if other than the district or may be sold by the board of directors at public or private sale. The amount of the bond shall be the amount of the lien, including incidental expenses allowable under the Improvement Act of 1911. The bond term and interest rate shall be determined by the board of directors within the limits established by the Improvement Act of 1911 and other applicable provisions of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1257, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

31149.

Any violation of a regulation of the district adopted pursuant to Section 31145 is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment not to exceed 60 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Each day of such a violation shall constitute a separate offense. Any violation or threatened violation of a regulation of the district may also be enjoined by civil suit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 412.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Power Generation [31149.1. - 31149.7.]

31149.1.

A district may, by using any water or water supplies furnished to the district or used by the district, construct, maintain, and operate one or more plants for the generation of hydroelectric power from the water, and the transmission lines for the conveyance thereof.

“Plant for the generation of hydroelectric power” includes water driven generators and appurtenant facilities for the generation of electric power and structures for the protection of the generators on appurtenant facilities.

The plant or plants so constructed shall be operated in a manner which is compatible with the proper operation of the district’s water storage, transmission, and distribution system. Construction of the plant or plants and transmission lines may be financed by the issuance of general obligation bonds or revenue bonds or any other method of financing district works authorized in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 79, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

31149.2.

The hydroelectric power plant or plants and transmission lines constructed pursuant to this article may be leased for operation by, or the power generated may be sold to, a public utility or public agency engaged in the distribution, use, or sale of electricity. The power generated may be used by a district for its own purposes, or for the production or transmission of water, but shall not be offered for sale directly by a district to customers other than such a public utility or public agency. The power to acquire works and facilities shall not include, and nothing in this article shall be interpreted to allow, the acquisition of property already employed in the generation of hydroelectric energy for public utility purposes, except by mutual agreement between the district and the owner of that property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 79, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

31149.3.

(a) The North Marin County Water District may construct, maintain, and operate one or more plants for the generation of power from wind or solar radiation, and the transmission lines for the conveyance thereof, and in connection therewith shall have all the powers set forth in this article for the generation of hydroelectric power.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 31149.1, the North Marin County Water District may use any water for the generation of hydroelectric power subject, however, to any limitations or provisions contained in Section 106.7, Part 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2, or any other provisions of law. The hydroelectric power shall be developed so as to meet the direct and indirect energy requirements of the district for the proper operation of the district’s water storage, transmission, and distribution system.

(c) The authority contained in subdivision (b), in the case of sole projects of the North Marin County Water District, may only be exercised by the district if the project is approved by the board of supervisors of the county in which the project is located or, in the case of joint projects, may only be exercised by the district if the project is approved by contract with the public agency acting as lead agency on the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 468, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31149.4.

Notwithstanding Section 31149.1 or any other provision of law, the Sierra Lakes County Water District may construct works for generating hydroelectric power, at Lake Dulzura and Lake Serena and on Serena Creek in Placer County, and may operate and maintain the works, or contract for that operation or maintenance.

Construction of the works authorized by this section may be financed by the issuance of general obligation bonds or revenue bonds or any other method of financing authorized by law for public agencies. The power generated may be used by the district for its own purposes, but shall not be offered for sale directly by the district to customers other than a public utility or public agency engaged in the distribution, use, or sale of electricity.

Any of the powers may be exercised jointly with other public agencies authorized to exercise those powers. The power to acquire works and facilities does not include, and nothing in this section authorizes, the acquisition of property already employed in the generation of hydroelectric energy for public utility purposes, except by mutual agreement between the district and the owner of that property. The authority to construct, maintain, and operate works pursuant to this section applies only to works constructed and maintained after January 1, 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 795, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31149.5.

(a) The Marina County Water District may finance, construct, maintain, operate, lease, use, and sell power to any public utility or public agency from one or more plants within the district’s boundaries for the cogeneration of electric power in conjunction with facilities for removing dissolved solids and impurities from seawater, and may finance, construct, maintain, operate, and lease the transmission lines for the conveyance of the power.

(b) Prior to January 1, 1996, the district may not exercise the authority set forth in subdivision (a) to provide water that is a substitute for water from the Monterey County Water Resources Agency’s seawater intrusion project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

31149.7.

(a) A district may provide, generate, and deliver electric power, and may construct, operate, and maintain any and all works, facilities, improvements, and property, or portion thereof, necessary or convenient for that generation and delivery.

(b) The electric powerplant or plants and transmission lines constructed pursuant to this section may be leased for operation. The power generated shall be used by a district for its own purposes. A district may sell surplus power to a public or private entity that is engaged in the distribution or sale of electricity. For purposes of this section, “for its own purposes” means a district performing only functions in its capacity as a water district, including, but not be limited to, any of the following:

(1) Pumping operations.

(2) Water treatment operations.

(3) Barrier intrusion operations.

(4) Desalination operations.

(c) Nothing in this section grants to a district the authority to provide, sell, or deliver electric power at retail.

(d) A district may not acquire property employed in the generation or delivery of electric power for public or private utility purposes, except by mutual agreement between the district and the owner of that property.

(e) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature, that each district that has purchased electricity from an electrical corporation on or after February 1, 2001, regardless of whether the district thereafter generates its own electricity, bear a pro rata share of the Department of Water Resources’ electricity purchase costs, that are recoverable from electrical corporation customers in commission-approved rates. It is the further intent of the Legislature to prevent any shifting of recoverable costs from districts that generate their own electricity pursuant to this section, to electrical corporation bundled customers.

(2) To the extent that any shifting of recoverable costs would occur, in the determination of the commission, those costs shall be recovered from districts that generate their own electricity, pursuant to this section.

(3) The Legislature finds and declares that the revisions of this subdivision are consistent with the requirements of Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2001, First Extraordinary Session, and do not constitute a change in, but are declaratory of existing law.

(f) A district that generates its own electricity pursuant to this section shall be responsible for paying the following:

(1) A charge equivalent to the charges that would otherwise be imposed on the district by the commission to recover bond related costs pursuant to any agreement between the commission and the Department of Water Resources pursuant to Section 80110 of the Water Code, which charges shall be payable until all obligations of the Department of Water Resources pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code are fully paid or otherwise discharged. All bond charges are the property of the Department of Water Resources.

(2) If a district generates new offsite power, it shall be responsible for the additional costs of the Department of Water Resources, equal to the share of the Department of Water Resources’ estimated net unavoidable electricity purchase contract costs attributable to the district as determined by the commission, for the period commencing with the district’s initial generation of its offsite electricity, through the expiration of all then existing electricity purchase contracts entered into by the Department of Water Resources.

(g) A district generating its own electricity pursuant to this section shall reimburse the electrical corporation that previously served the district for all of the following:

(1) The electrical corporation’s unrecovered past undercollections for electricity purchases, including any financing costs, attributable to that district, that the commission lawfully determines may be recovered in rates.

(2) Any additional costs of the electrical corporation recoverable in commission approved rates, equal to the share of the electrical corporation’s estimated net unavoidable electricity purchase contract costs attributable to the district, as determined by the commission, for the period commencing with the district’s initial generation of electricity pursuant to this section, through the expiration of all then existing electricity purchase contracts entered into by the electrical corporation.

(h) (1) Any charges imposed pursuant to subdivision (f) shall be the property of the Department of Water Resources. Any charges imposed pursuant to subdivision (g) shall be the property of the particular electrical corporation. The commission shall establish sufficient mechanisms, including agreements with, or orders with respect to, electrical corporations as are necessary to ensure that charges payable pursuant to this section shall be promptly remitted to the party entitled to the payment.

(2) Charges imposed pursuant to this section shall be nonbypassable.

(i) Prior to implementing this section, the commission shall submit a report certifying its satisfaction of the provisions of this section to the Senate Energy, Utilities and Communications Committee, or its successor, and the Assembly Committee on Utilities and Commerce, or its successor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 848, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Cooperation [31150. - 31182.]



  ARTICLE 1. Cooperation Under Irrigation District Federal Cooperation Law [31150. - 31162.]

31150.

Districts may cooperate and contract with the United States, under the Federal Reclamation Act of June 17, 1902, and all acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto or any other act of Congress heretofore or hereafter enacted permitting cooperation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31151.

The cooperation and contract may be for any or all of the following purposes:

(a) Acquisition, extension, or operation of works for irrigation or drainage or flood control, or the development of electric or other power.

(b) A water supply.

(c) Assumption as principal or guarantor of indebtedness to the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31152.

Districts may carry out and perform the terms of any contract so made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31153.

To carry out the preceding sections of this article a district has all powers, rights, and privileges possessed by irrigation districts and may exercise those powers, rights, and privileges in the same manner as irrigation districts as provided in the Irrigation District Federal Cooperation Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31154.

If any provision of the Irrigation District Federal Cooperation Law is held unconstitutional, that decision shall not affect the validity of the adoption by reference in this article of the remaining portions of that law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31155.

In any contract made between a county water district and the United States pursuant to this article, the land which may be charged with any taxes or assessments under the contract shall be designated and described.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31156.

The contract shall not include any land which is not susceptible of service with water from the water works or system contemplated in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31157.

The proceedings for voting at an election upon a proposal to contract with the United States pursuant to this article shall be had insofar as applicable in the manner provided in Articles 1, 2, and 3 of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1235.)
-------------------------------------------

31158.

Notwithstanding any provision of the Irrigation District Federal Cooperation Law, or any provision of this division or other law, when any district has contracted with the United States pursuant to this article or any other law for the purposes set forth in Section 31151, if the revenues of the district from water rates are, or in the judgment of the board are likely to be, inadequate to pay all charges payable to the United States or otherwise under the contract, then any tax or assessment levied for the payment of any of those charges in any manner provided by law shall be levied only upon land, exclusive of improvements and personal property, in the portion of the district to be served with water under the contract as therein described or thereunder modified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31159.

Every county water district which executes a contract with the United States for the purposes set forth in Section 31151 shall, within the meaning of the act of Congress approved August 11, 1916, entitled “An act to promote the reclamation of arid lands” and of the act of Congress approved May 15, 1922, entitled “An act to provide for the application of the reclamation law to irrigation districts,” be deemed to be an irrigation district organized and created under the irrigation district laws of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31160.

Public land of the United States within any such county water district is subject to assessment and taxation for all purposes of such district to the extent provided in said acts of Congress upon full compliance therewith by the county water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31161.

Whenever the Government of the United States has in conjunction with a district contributed to the cost of building a dam creating a lake and the water impounded by the dam is to be used for domestic, irrigation, and recreational purposes, the district may do either of the following:

(a) Establish and operate recreational facilities and appliances upon the water of the lake and the land adjacent thereto.

(b) Lease the water and land to others for those purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31162.

The operation of all facilities and appliances permitted by Section 31161 shall be in accordance with rules and regulations applicable thereto adopted by the board subject to the provisions of Section 531 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Water Service to Indian Land [31175. - 31175.]

31175.

A district may contract with the United States, upon such terms the board finds to be to the best interest of the district, for permanent or temporary service of water to Indian lands lying within the exterior boundaries of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Inclusion in Municipal Utility District [31180. - 31182.]

31180.

A county water district may be annexed to or included within the territory of any municipal utility district organized under the Municipal Utility District Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31181.

The annexation or inclusion shall not destroy the identity or legal existence of the county water district notwithstanding the identity of purpose or substantial identity of purpose of the municipal utility district to which or into which the county water district is included or annexed or the transfer of any property by the county water district to the municipal utility district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31182.

The annexation may be effected pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing at Section 13801) of Division 6, Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. FINANCIAL PROVISIONS [31300. - 31639.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Financial Provisions [31300. - 31339.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [31300. - 31310.]

31300.

A district may borrow money, incur indebtedness, and issue bonds or other evidences of the indebtedness, and may refund or retire any indebtedness or lien against the district or its property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31301.

The district may issue warrants to pay its formation expenses bearing interest at 6 percent per year from date of issue until funds are available to pay the warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31302.

The auditor shall draw warrants to pay demands made against the district when the demands have been approved or authorized by the board, or at least three members thereof, and by the general manager; or, in his absence or inability to act, by an officer or director therefor authorized by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31303.

Any money belonging to a district may be deposited or invested and drawn out as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 53630) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, as now or hereafter amended. References in that chapter to “treasurer” shall mean, for the purposes of a district, the auditor thereof and to “auditor” shall mean, for the purposes of a district, the secretary thereof. This section provides for a deposit and investment procedure separate from that provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 31335).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 460.)
-------------------------------------------

31304.

The district, or the district on behalf of an improvement district thereof, may issue negotiable promissory notes which shall be payable from general taxes, revenues, and other available funds of the district or the improvement district, as the case may be, other than taxes levied for the payment of principal and interest on any bonded indebtedness of the district or an improvement distict therein. The notes shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding 8 percent per annum and shall mature and be payable not later than five years from the date of issue. The balance of such notes unpaid shall not at any one time exceed 2 percent of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district or the improvement district, as the case may be, or, if said assessed valuation is not obtainable, 2 percent of the county auditor’s estimate of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district, or the improvement district, as evidenced by his certificate; provided, however, that a district which has been formed for less than 18 months may borrow an amount not exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or an amount not exceeding 2 percent of the assessed valuation or estimated valuation of the taxable property in the district, whichever is greater.

No district shall borrow, pursuant to this section, for purposes other than flood control, in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000); provided, however, that any district with an assessed valuation in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) may borrow, pursuant to this section, for purposes other than flood control, an amount not exceeding 1 percent of the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

31304.5.

A district may contract with any state agency to finance any district improvement authorized by this division that is related to the provision of water for human consumption. The terms of the contract shall be consistent with this division. Notwithstanding any other provision in this division, the term of the contract may extend up to 30 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 606, Sec. 11.   Effective October 9, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

31305.

The board may designate the county treasurer the depositary to have the custody of all, or a portion of, the district’s money.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1573.)
-------------------------------------------

31306.

If designated as depositary the county treasurer shall:

(a) Receive and receipt for all of the district’s money received by him and place it in the county treasury to the credit of the district.

(b) Be responsible upon his official bond for the safekeeping and disbursing of all district money so held by him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1573.)
-------------------------------------------

31307.

When the county treasurer has been designated the depositary to have custody of district money, he shall pay out that money, or any portion thereof, only upon warrants of the county auditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1573.)
-------------------------------------------

31308.

The county auditor shall draw warrants to pay demands made against the district when the demands have been approved by at least three members of the board and the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31309.

The county treasurer shall report in writing on the first day of July, October, January, and March of each year to the board with respect to each of the following:

(a) The amount of money he then holds for the district.

(b) The amount of receipts since his last report.

(c) The amount paid out since his last report. The report shall be verified and filed with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31310.

The board of supervisors of the county shall determine the charge to be made against the district for any services of either or both of:

(a) The county treasurer as custodian of the district’s money.

(b) The county auditor in drawing warrants to pay demands made and approved against the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Settlements and Statements [31320. - 31322.]

31320.

On Monday in each week the collector shall do both of the following:

(a) Settle with the secretary for all money collected for taxes during the week next preceding.

(b) Pay the money to the depositary designated by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31321.

The collector shall be credited in his settlement with the secretary with the amount due to the district on property he sells to the district for delinquent taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31322.

Within seven days after he settles with the secretary, the collector shall file in the district office with the secretary a statement under oath, showing:

(a) An account of all his transactions and receipts during the period for which the settlement was made.

(b) Payment to the depositary of all money collected by him as collector during the period for which the settlement was made, and the receipts of the depositary for the money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Investments [31335. - 31339.]

31335.

As used in this article “surplus money” means any money in any sinking fund established for the purpose of payment of any bonded or other indebtedness or any money in the treasury not required for the immediate necessities of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31336.

A district may invest such surplus money, as its board deems wise or expedient in any of the following:

(a) Bonds issued by the district.

(b) Bonds issued by any school district any part of which is in a county containing any part of the county water district.

(c) Bonds issued by the State.

(d) Bonds issued by the United States.

(e) Registered warrants issued by the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31337.

The investment may be made by purchase of the bonds or registered warrants or part thereof at the original sale or by purchase after they have been thus issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31338.

Any bonds or registered warrants purchased pursuant to this article and held may, from time to time, be sold and the proceeds reinvested pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31339.
